Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-335
Liquidation; insolvency; special shareholders' meeting; report of department.

The Department of Banking and Finance shall, within ten days next after acquiring possession of such association, convene a special meeting of the shareholders. Notice of such special meeting shall be given by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where such association is located and by written or printed notice posted in a conspicuous place in the office or place of business of the association. At such meeting the department shall present a full report of the affairs and condition of such association as found by its examination thereof.

Laws 1899, c. 17, § 19b, p. 95;

R.S.1913, § 505;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XIX, § 21, p. 733;

C.S.1922, § 8103;

C.S.1929, § 8-320;

R.S.1943, § 8-335.